Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62J.825] UNIQUE NATIONAL PROVIDER IDENTIFIERS FOR PROVIDER BASED CLINICS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Health care clearinghouse" has the meaning given in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 160.103. new text end new text begin (c) "National Provider Identifier" or "NPI" means the standard, unique health identifier for health care providers that is issued by the national provider system in accordance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, part 162. new text end new text begin (d) "Provider-based clinic" means the site of an off-campus clinic or provider office, located at least 250 yards from the main hospital buildings or as determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that is owned by a hospital licensed under chapter 144, or a health system that operates one or more hospitals licensed under chapter 144, and is primarily engaged in providing diagnostic and therapeutic care, including medical history, physical examinations, assessment of health status, and treatment monitoring. Provider-based clinic does not include clinics that are exclusively providing laboratory, x-ray, testing, therapy, pharmacy, or educational services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Unique NPI. new text end new text begin (a) Provider-based clinics must apply for, obtain, and use on all claims for reimbursement or payment for health services provided at the provider-based clinic a unique NPI that is distinct from the hospital's NPI. new text end new text begin (b) The provider-based clinic's unique NPI must be included on all claims for reimbursement or payment for health services provided at the provider-based clinic, regardless of whether the claim is filed or submitted by or through a central office of the hospital, a health care clearinghouse, or any other intermediary. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62U.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Unique National Provider Identifier (NPI). new text end new text begin Data submitted under this section relating to a provider-based clinic, as defined in section 62J.825, and which includes an NPI, as defined in section 62J.825, must include the provider-based clinic's unique NPI that is distinct from the hospital's NPI. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end